Washington statutes.
RCW 7.21.060

Administrative actions or proceedings—Petition to court for imposition of sanctions.

A state administrative agency conducting an action or proceeding or a party to the action or proceeding may petition the superior court in the county in which the action or proceeding is being conducted for a remedial sanction specified in RCW 7.21.030 for conduct specified in RCW 7.21.010 in the action or proceeding.

[ 1989 c 373 s 6.]